Florida, session 2026, HB317.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Gay and
Transgender Panic Legal Defenses Prohibition Act."
Section 2. The Legislature finds that gay and transgender
panic legal defenses raised in criminal proceedings characterize
sexual orientation and gender expression or gender identity as
objectively reasonable excuses for a perpetrator's loss of self-
control, and that these defenses thereby illegitimately attempt
to mitigate the responsibility of the perpetrator for harm done
to lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender persons.
Section 3. Section 900.06, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
900.06 Use of gay and transgender panic legal defenses
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb317-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 317 2026
prohibited.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Gender expression" or "gender identity" means gender-
related identity, appearance, or behavior, regardless of whether
such gender-related identity, appearance, or behavior is
different from that traditionally associated with a person's
physiology or assigned sex at birth.
(b) "Sexual orientation" means a person's actual or
perceived heterosexuality, homosexuality, or bisexuality.
(2) A nonviolent sexual advance or the perception or
belief, even if inaccurate, of the sex, sexual orientation,
gender expression, or gender identity of a person may not be
used as a defense to a criminal offense, to excuse or to justify
the conduct of a person who commits a criminal offense, or to
mitigate the severity of a criminal offense during sentencing.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb317-00